Hawaii statutes.
[§428-502] Transfer of distributional
interest. A transfer of a distributional interest does not entitle the
transferee to become or to exercise any rights of a member. A transfer
entitles the transferee to receive, to the extent transferred, only the distributions
to which the transferor would be entitled. A member ceases to be a member upon
transfer of all of the member's distributional interest, other than a transfer
for security purposes, or a court order charging the member's distributional
interest, which has not been foreclosed. [L 1996, c 92, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next